Vermont, session 2025-2026, H287.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. VERMONT SMALL NUCLEAR CONSORTIUM
(a) Creation. On or before August 1, 2025, in order to assist in reaching the
State’s climate goals and to provide for economic development opportunities,
the Secretary of Administration shall convene the Vermont Small Nuclear
VT LEG #379517 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.287
2025 Page 2 of 4
Consortium to identify the obstacles to constructing small modular reactors in
Vermont, including those in State and federal law.
(b) Membership. The Consortium shall have members appointed as
follows:
(1) the Secretary of Administration or designee;
(2) two current members of the House of Representatives, each from
separate political parties, who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) two current members of the Senate, each from separate political
parties, who shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees;
(4) a representative from an environmental organization, who shall be
appointed by the Secretary of Administration;
(5) representatives from at least three different electric distribution
utilities, who shall be appointed by the Secretary of Administration;
(6) a representative from the State Treasurer’s Office; and
(7) any person who participated in the prior Vermont Nuclear
Consortium.
(c) Powers and duties. The Consortium shall:
(1) review reasons why the prior nuclear generation facility closed, what
obstacles and opportunities exist in both State and federal law, and what
practical issues may exist that would prevent or facilitate a new facility from
opening;
VT LEG #379517 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.287
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) hear from a variety of stakeholders on this issue, including
representatives of relevant State agencies, representatives from developers, and
proponents of small modular reactors; and
(3) examine financial resources available to facilitate the construction of
small nuclear reactors.
(d) Assistance. The Consortium shall have the assistance of the relevant
State agencies and may hire a consultant to assist the Consortium.
(e) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Consortium serving in the legislator’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than five
meetings in fiscal year 2026.
(2) Other members of the Consortium who are not otherwise
compensated by their employer shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more
than five meetings in fiscal year 2026.
(3) The payments under this subsection shall be made from monies
appropriated by the General Assembly.
(f) Report. On or before August 1, 2026, the Consortium shall submit a
written report to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy, the
VT LEG #379517 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.287
2025 Page 4 of 4
House Committee on Energy and Digital Infrastructure, and the Governor with
a summary of the feasibility study and recommendations for next steps,
including any legislative action needed.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2026, $23,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Secretary of Administration for the compensation for Consortium members
and to hire a consultant to assist the work of the Vermont Small Nuclear
Consortium.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379517 v.5